Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER 323G]

HOSPITAL DISCHARGE PLANNING--DESIGNATION OF A
CAREGIVER

Section

323G-1
Definitions

323G-2
Designation of a caregiver

323G-3
Noninterference with existing health care directives

323G-4
Limitation of liability

323G-5
Preservation of coverage

Note

Chapter effective
July 1, 2017.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next